District of Columbia statutes.
25-752

Containers to be labeled.

No rectified or blended spirits shall be sold unless the container in which it is sold shall bear a legible label, firmly affixed, stating the nature and percentage of each ingredient (except water), the age of the ingredient, and the alcoholic content by volume.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 336, ch. 4, § 36
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

History

1981 Ed., § 25-752.
1973 Ed., § 25-134.

Prior Codifications